ro-RO: Stil cu rever: Contrastant; Guler tunică/fără guler; Fără; Crestat; Ascuțit; Șal; Altele
pt-PT: Estilo da lapela: Em contraste; Gola de padre/sem gola; Nenhum; Clássica; Em bico; Xaile; Outro
cs: Styl klopy: Kontrastní; Stojáček / bez límce; Žádná; Otevřená klopa; Špičatá klopa; Šálová klopa; Jiné
ru: Стиль лацканов: Контрастный; Стойка / без воротника; Нет; Прямоугольный; Заостренный; Шалевый; Другое
vi: Kiểu ve áo: Tương phản; Cổ tàu/không cổ; Không có; Ve vuông; Ve nhọn; Ve sam; Khác
hu: Hajtóka stílusa: Kontrasztos; Mandarin/gallér nélküli; Nincs; Bevágott; Hegyes; Sálgallér; Egyéb
it: Stile del risvolto: A contrasto; Alla coreana/senza colletto; Nessuno; A dente; A lancia; A scialle; Altro
zh-TW: 翻領款式: 對比色; 立領/無領; 無; 平駁領; 劍領; 絲瓜領; 其他
sv: Slagstil för kavaj: Kontrast; Mandarin/krage saknas; Ingen; Trubbig; Spetsig; Sjalkrage; Övrigt
pl: Styl klap: Kontrastowe; Stójka / bez kołnierza; Brak; Otwarte (notch); W szpic (peak); Szalkowe; Inne
es: Tipo de solapa: En contraste; Mandarín/sin cuello; Ninguno; De muesca; En punta; Chal; Otro
th: สไตล์ปกเสื้อ: สีตัดกัน; คอจีน/ไร้ปก; ไม่มี; ปกป้าน; ปกแหลม; ปกกล้วยหอม; อื่นๆ
ko: 라펠 스타일: 대비; 만다린/칼라 없음; 없음; 노치; 피크; 숄; 기타
pt-BR: Lapela estilo: Contraste; Gola padre/sem gola; Nenhum; Entalhe; Bico; Xale; Outro
da: Reversstil: Kontrast; Kinaflip/uden krave; Ingen; Notch; Spidst; Sjal; Andet
fi: Takinkäänteen tyyli: Kontrasti; Mandariini / kaulukseton; Ei mitään; Lovi; Pysty; Saali; Muu
hr-HR: Stil revera: Kontrastni; Mandarinski / bez ovratnika; Nema; Klasični; Šiljasti; Šal; Ostalo
bg-BG: Стил на ревера: Контрастен; Мандарин/без яка; Няма; Класически (с изрязан ъгъл); Заострен (peak); Шален (shawl); Друго
ja: ラペルスタイル: コントラスト; マンダリン/ノーカラー; なし; ノッチ; ピーク; ショール; その他
fr: Style de revers: Contrastant; Mao/sans col; Aucun; À crans; À crans aigus; Châle; Autre
nl: Revers stijl: Contrast; Mandarijn/kraagloos; Geen; Haakrevers; Puntrevers; Sjaalkraag; Overig
lt-LT: Atlapo stilius: Kontrastingas; Mandarininė / be apykaklės; Nėra; Su įkirptu atvartu; Su smailiu atvartu; Šalio tipo; Kita
el: Στυλ πέτου: Με αντίθεση; Γιακάς μάο/χωρίς γιακά; Κανένα; Κλασικό πέτο (notch); Μυτερό πέτο (peak); Στρογγυλό πέτο (shawl); Άλλο
en: Lapel style: Contrast; Mandarin/collarless; None; Notch; Peak; Shawl; Other
sl-SI: Slog ovratnika: Kontrast; Mandarinski/brez ovratnika; Brez; Zarezani; Koničasti; Šalasti; Drugo
tr: Yaka stili: Kontrast; Hakim yaka/yakasız; Yok; Çentikli; Sivri; Şal; Diğer
sk-SK: Štýl klopy: Kontrastná; Mandarínska/bez goliera; Žiadna; S výrezom; Špicatá; Šálová; Iné
de: Reversstil: Kontrast; Stehkragen/Kragenlos; Keine; Fallendes Revers; Steigendes Revers; Schalkragen; Sonstige
nb: Slagtype: Kontrast; Mandarin/kragefri; Ingen; Hakk; Spiss; Sjal; Annet
zh-CN: 翻领样式: 撞色; 立领/无领; 无; 平驳领; 戗驳领; 青果领; 其他